en: Soap Dishes & Holders
xx: Soap Dishes & Holders
cs: Mýdelníky
da: Sæbeskåle
de: Seifenablagen
es: Jaboneras
fr: Porte-savons
it: Portasapone
ja: ソープディッシュ・石けん台
nl: Zeepbakjes
no: Såpekopper og -holdere
pl: Mydelniczki
pt: Saboneteiras
ru: Мыльницы
sv: Tvålhållare
tr: Sabun Altlık ve Tutucuları

en: Toilet Brush Replacement Heads
xx: Toilet Brush Replacement Heads
cs: Náhradní hlavice pro WC kartáče
da: Toiletbørstehoveder
de: Toilettenbürstenköpfe
es: Cabezales de repuesto para escobillas de baño
fr: Têtes de rechange pour brosses de toilettes
it: Spazzole sostitutive per scopini da WC
ja: トイレブラシ交換ヘッド
nl: Losse toiletborstelkoppen
no: Reservehoder for toalettbørster
pl: Końcówki szczotek toaletowych
pt: Cabeças para escovas de vaso sanitário
ru: Запасные щётки для туалетных ершиков
sv: Reservhuvuden för toalettborstar
tr: Tuvalet Fırçası Yedek Uçları

en: Toilet Brushes & Holders
xx: Toilet Brushes & Holders
cs: WC kartáče a držáky
da: Toiletbørster
de: Toilettenbürsten & -halter
es: Escobillas de baño y escobilleros
fr: Brosses de toilettes et porte-brosses, Support brosse WC
it: Scopini e portascopini
ja: トイレブラシ・ホルダー
nl: Toiletborstels en -houders
no: Toalettbørster og børsteholdere
pl: Szczotki toaletowe z uchwytami
pt: Suportes e escovas de vaso sanitário
ru: Туалетные ёршики
sv: Toalettborstar
tr: Tuvalet Fırçaları ve Tutucuları

en: Toilet Paper Holders
xx: Toilet Paper Holders
cs: Držáky na toaletní papír
da: Toiletrulleholdere
de: Toilettenpapierhalter
es: Portarrollos
fr: Distributeurs de papier hygiénique
it: Porta carta igienica
ja: トイレットペーパーホルダー
nl: Toiletpapierhouders
no: Toalettbørsteholdere
pl: Uchwyty na papier toaletowy
pt: Porta-papel higiênico
ru: Держатели для туалетной бумаги
sv: Toalettpappershållare
tr: Tuvalet Kağıdı Tutucuları

en: Toothbrush Holders
xx: Toothbrush Holders
cs: Držáky na zubní kartáčky
da: Tandbørsteholdere
de: Zahnbürstenhalter
es: Vasos para cepillos de dientes
fr: Porte-brosses à dents
it: Porta spazzolini
ja: 歯ブラシスタンド
nl: Tandenborstelhouders
no: Tannbørsteholdere
pl: Uchwyty na szczoteczki do zębów
pt: Porta-escovas de dentes
ru: Держатели для зубных щеток
sv: Tandborsthållare
tr: Diş Fırçalıkları

en: Towel Racks & Holders
xx: Towel Racks & Holders
cs: Věšáky a skříňky na ručníky
da: Håndklædeholdere
de: Handtuchhalter
es: Toalleros
fr: Porte-serviettes
it: Porta salviette
ja: タオル掛け
nl: Handdoekrekken en -houders
no: Håndklestativer og -holdere
pl: Uchwyty i wieszaki na ręczniki
pt: Porta-toalhas e suportes para toalhas
ru: Вешалки и полки для полотенец
sv: Handduksstänger och -hängare
tr: Havlu Rafları ve Tutucular

en: Business & Home Security
xx: Business & Home Security
cs: Zabezpečení firem a domácností
da: Sikkerhed i hjemmet
de: Haussicherheit
es: Seguridad empresarial y del hogar
fr: Sécurité à domicile et au bureau
it: Sicurezza in casa e sul lavoro
ja: 防犯・セキュリティ
nl: Bedrijfs- en woonhuisbeveiliging
no: Sikkerhet for hjem og bedrifter
pl: Bezpieczeństwo domu i biura
pt: Segurança domiciliar e comercial
ru: Средства обеспечения безопасности жилища
sv: Företags- och hemsäkerhet
tr: İş ve Ev Güvenliği

en: Dummy Surveillance Cameras
xx: Dummy Surveillance Cameras
cs: Falešné bezpečnostní kamery
da: Falske overvågningskameraer
de: Überwachungskamera-Attrappen
es: Cámaras de vigilancia ocultas
fr: Caméras de surveillance factices
it: Telecamere di sorveglianza finte
ja: 防犯用ダミーカメラ
nl: Namaakbeveiligingscamera's
no: Jukse-overvåkningskameraer
pl: Atrapy kamer przemysłowych
pt: Câmeras de vigilância falsas
ru: Ложные камеры наблюдения
sv: Falska övervakningskameror
tr: Sahte Güvenlik Kameraları

en: Home Alarm Systems
xx: Home Alarm Systems
cs: Domácí bezpečnostní systémy
da: Alarmsystemer til private
de: Hausalarmsysteme
es: Sistemas de alarmas para el hogar
fr: Systèmes d'alarme domestiques, Sirène (alarme), Alarme
it: Sistemi d'allarme domestici
ja: 住宅用警報システム
nl: Thuisalarmsystemen
no: Alarmanlegg
pl: Systemy alarmów domowych
pt: Sistemas de alarme domiciliar
ru: Домашние системы сигнализации
sv: Hemlarmsystem
tr: Ev Alarm Sistemleri

en: Motion Sensors
xx: Motion Sensors
cs: Pohybová čidla
da: Bevægelsessensorer
de: Bewegungsmelder
es: Sensores de movimiento
fr: Détecteurs de mouvement
it: Sensori di movimento
ja: モーションセンサー
nl: Bewegingssensoren
no: Bevegelsessensorer
pl: Czujniki ruchu
pt: Sensores de movimento
ru: Датчики движения
sv: Rörelsedetektorer
tr: Hareket Sensörleri

en: Safety & Security Mirrors
xx: Safety & Security Mirrors
cs: Bezpečnostní zrcadla
da: Sikkerhedsspejle
de: Sicherheitsspiegel
es: Espejos de vigilancia y seguridad
fr: Miroirs de sécurité et de surveillance
it: Specchi di sicurezza
ja: 安全/防犯ミラー
nl: Veiligheids- en bewakingsspiegels
no: Sikkerhetsspeil
pl: Lustra bezpieczeństwa
pt: Espelhos de segurança
ru: Зеркала безопасности
sv: Säkerhetsspeglar
tr: Emniyet ve Güvenlik Aynaları

en: Security Lights
xx: Security Lights
cs: Bezpečnostní světla
da: Sikkerhedslamper
de: Sicherheitsleuchten
es: Alumbrado de seguridad
fr: Lampes de sécurité
it: Luci di sicurezza
ja: 防犯ライト
nl: Beveiligingslampen
no: Sikkerhetslys
pl: Światła bezpieczeństwa
pt: Luzes de segurança
ru: Охранное освещение
sv: Säkerhetslampor
tr: Güvenlik Lambaları

en: Security Monitors & Recorders
xx: Security Monitors & Recorders
cs: Bezpečnostní kamery a záznamníky
da: Sikkerhedsskærme og -optagere
de: Überwachungsmonitore & -rekorder
es: Cámaras y monitores de seguridad
fr: Systèmes de surveillance et d'enregistrement
it: Monitor e sistemi di registrazione di sicurezza
ja: 防犯カメラ
nl: Beveiligingsmonitoren en -recorders
no: Sikkerhetsmonitorer og -opptakere
pl: Monitory i rejestratory bezpieczeństwa
pt: Monitores e câmeras de segurança
ru: Мониторы и рекордеры системы безопасности
sv: Säkerhetsmonitorer och videokameror
tr: Güvenlik Monitör ve Kayıt Cihazları

en: Security Safe Accessories
xx: Security Safe Accessories
cs: Trezory – příslušenství
da: Tilbehør til sikkerhedsbokse
de: Safe-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para cajas de seguridad
fr: Accessoires pour coffres-forts
it: Accessori per casseforti
ja: 金庫関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor veiligheidskluizen
no: Tilbehør til safer
pl: Akcesoria do sejfów
pt: Acessórios de segurança para cofres
ru: Принадлежности для сейфов
sv: Kassaskåpstillbehör
tr: Güvenlik Kasası Aksesuarları

en: Security Safes
xx: Security Safes
cs: Trezory
da: Sikkerhedsskabe
de: Safes & Tresore
es: Cajas fuertes
fr: Coffres-forts
it: Casseforti
ja: 金庫
nl: Kluizen
no: Pengeskap
pl: Sejfy
pt: Cofres
ru: Сейфы
sv: Kassaskåp
tr: Güvenlik Kasaları

en: Security System Sensors
xx: Security System Sensors
cs: Bezpečnostní senzory
da: Sensorer til sikkerhedssystemer
de: Sensoren für Sicherheitssysteme
es: Sensores de sistemas de seguridad
fr: Détecteurs pour systèmes de sécurité
it: Sensori sistemi sicurezza
ja: 防犯センサー
nl: Beveiligingssysteemsensoren
no: Sensorer for sikkerhetssystemer
pl: Czujniki systemu bezpieczeństwa
pt: Sensores de sistema de segurança
ru: Датчики систем безопасности
sv: Sensorer till säkerhetssystem
tr: Güvenlik Sistemi Sensörleri

en: Decor
xx: Decor
cs: Bytové doplňky a dekorace
da: Indretning
de: Dekoration
es: Decoración
fr: Décorations
it: Arredo
ja: インテリア・エクステリア
nl: Decoratie
no: Dekor
pl: Ozdoby do domu i ogrodu
pt: Decoração
ru: Декоративные элементы
sv: Dekor
tr: Dekor

en: Wall Hangings
xx: Wall Hangings
fr: Décorations murales, Macramé, Tissu mural, Toile tendue

en: Address Signs
xx: Address Signs
cs: Domovní cedulky
da: Adresseskilte
de: Hausnummernschilder
es: Rótulos para casas
fr: Plaques d'adresse
it: Targhe indirizzo
ja: 表札
nl: Adresbordjes
no: Adresseskilt
pl: Tabliczki adresowe
pt: Placas de endereço
ru: Адресные знаки и таблички
sv: Adresskyltar
tr: Adres Tabelaları

en: Artificial Flora
xx: Artificial Flora
cs: Umělá flóra
da: Kunstig flora
de: Künstliche Pflanzen
es: Flora artificial
fr: Fleurs et plantes artificielles
it: Flora artificiale
ja: 造花・人工樹木
nl: Kunstflora
no: Kunstig flora
pl: Sztuczne rośliny
pt: Flores sintéticas
ru: Искусственная флора
sv: Artificiell flora
tr: Yapay Floralar